North Carolina, session 2025, HB745.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The North Carolina Public Utilities Commission shall conduct a study
that accomplishes all of the following:
(1) Assesses the costs and benefits of the current energy market in North Carolina.
(2) Assesses possible reforms to be made to the Southeastern Energy Exchange
Market.
(3) Evaluates the feasibility, costs, and benefits of an energy imbalance market or
regional transmission organization in North Carolina and South Carolina or
the Southeastern United States.
(4) Determines the necessary legal and procedural requirements for establishing
an energy imbalance market in North Carolina and South Carolina or a larger
geographical grid such as a regional transmission organization.
SECTION 2. For the purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Consultant. – An independent, qualified individual or entity retained by the
legislature to conduct objective, evidence-based research and analysis related
to utility regulation, cost-recovery practices, and ratepayer impacts in North
*H745-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Carolina. The consultant must have demonstrated expertise in energy policy,
utility regulation, public interest advocacy, and must maintain neutrality by
being free from conflicts of interest, including any financial, professional, or
personal ties to utility companies or their affiliates.
(2) Energy imbalance market. – A voluntary market for dispatching real-time
energy across utility service territories in which each participating utility
retains ownership and control of its transmission assets but opts to bid
generation into a centralized dispatch authority.
(3) Regional transmission organization. – An independent, nonprofit organization
that manages the transmission, generation, and retail sale of electricity in a
region and is responsible for the reliability of the real-time electricity market.
(4) Southeastern Energy Exchange Market. – A 15-minute automated energy
exchange market between balancing authorities in the Southeastern United
States involving over 15 entities.
SECTION 3. The Commission shall initiate the study within 90 days after the date
this act becomes law. Within one year of the date of enactment of this act, the Commission shall
submit a written report to the Joint Legislative Energy Policy Commission concerning the results
of the study. The Commission may contract for professional, clerical, or consultant services as
provided by G.S. 120-32.02. The Commission shall seek additional federal funding for the study
to the extent available. The study shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:
(1) An evaluation of establishing an open access energy imbalance market within
the geographical boundaries of North Carolina and the broader Southeast.
Specific analysis shall be conducted in the following areas:
a. Electricity generation and capacity adequacy and diversity.
b. Customer service and rates.
c. Environmental quality and carbon emissions.
d. Economic opportunity.
e. The potential impacts, including costs and benefits, of an energy
imbalance market on disadvantaged or vulnerable populations or
communities or both.
(2) An evaluation of establishing a Southeastern Regional Transmission
Organization. Specific analysis shall be conducted in all of the following
areas:
a. Electricity generation and capacity adequacy and diversity.
b. Customer service and rates.
c. Environmental quality and carbon emissions.
d. Economic opportunity.
e. The potential impacts, including costs and benefits, of an energy
imbalance market on disadvantaged or vulnerable populations or
communities or both.
(3) An assessment of possible inefficiencies in the Southeastern Energy Exchange
Market and an examination of the costs, benefits, and risks to State and local
government, utilities, independent power producers, businesses, and
customers of all classes regarding the following aspects of the State and
region's current electricity system versus an energy imbalance market or
potential regional transmission organization. Specific analysis shall be
conducted in all of the following areas:
a. Electricity generation and capacity adequacy and diversity.
b. Customer service and rates.
c. Environmental quality and carbon emissions.
d. Economic opportunity.
Page 2 House Bill 745-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e. The potential impacts, including costs and benefits, of an energy
imbalance market on disadvantaged or vulnerable populations or
communities or both.
(4) The legal and procedural requirements in North Carolina, at the Federal
Energy Regulatory Commission, or in other states associated with the
adoption of an energy imbalance market or regional transmission
organization, including identification of existing laws, regulations, and
policies that may need to be amended to implement the electricity market
reform measures.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Utilities Commission the sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to conduct the study authorized by this act.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 745-First Edition Page 3